Missouri, session 2026, HB2357.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 407.3450, to read as follows:
407.3450. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Minor", an individual under eighteen years of age;
(2) "Person", an individual who is not the parent or legal guardian of a minor;
(3) "Prepaid mobile device", a cellular telephone or other communication device
for which the mobile device user purchases a set allotment of wireless communication
services;
(4) "Wireless communication services", any mobile service that is provided for
profit and makes interconnected service available to the public.
2. (1) No minor shall purchase a prepaid mobile device or refill a prepaid mobile
device with wireless communication services on a previously purchased prepaid mobile
device.
(2) No person shall purchase a prepaid mobile device or refill a prepaid mobile
device with wireless communication services on a previously purchased prepaid mobile
device for a minor.
3. (1) A violation under subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section shall be an
infraction.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2357 2
(2) For the first violation under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section, the
person shall be guilty of a class D misdemeanor. For a second and any subsequent
violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section, or if the person has a history of
crimes against children, the person shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
✔